Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 26
RAILROAD TICKETS

40-26-101 to 40-26-109. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article repealed, p. 219, § 8, effective March 29.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 7 of chapter 116, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2000, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.